Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
ARTICLE 30
COLORADO LIMITED GAMING ACT

Editor's note:

This article 30 was added with relocations in 2018. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 30, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For article, "Limited Gaming is Now a Reality", 20

C

olo. Law. 2239 (1991).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 DIVISION OF GAMING

PART 3 COLORADO LIMITED GAMING
CONTROL COMMISSION

PART 4 CONFLICT OF INTEREST

PART 5 LICENSING

PART 6 GAMING TAX

PART 7 LIMITED GAMING FUND

PART 8 UNLAWFUL ACTS

PART 9 CHARITABLE GAMING

PART 10 EXCLUDED PERSONS

PART 11 GAMING DEVICES

PART 12 STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY

PART 13 LOCAL GOVERNMENT LIMITED
GAMING IMPACT FUND

PART 14 INDEPENDENT RESTORATION AND
PRESERVATION COMMISSION

PART 15 SPORTS BETTING

PART 16 FANTASY CONTESTS

PART 17 MEASURES TO PROMOTE RESPONSIBLE GAMING